Utah statutes.
48-1d-1301.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Professional services partnership" means a limited liability partnership organized in accordance with this part to provide professional services.

(2)  "Regulating board" means the entity organized pursuant to state law that licenses and regulates the practice of the profession that a limited liability partnership is organized to provide.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

